New York, session 2025-2026, S6219.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 410.10 of the criminal procedure 2 law is amended to read as follows: 3 1. When the court pronounces a sentence of probation or of conditional 4 discharge it must specify as part of the sentence the conditions to be 5 complied with. Where the sentence is one of probation, the defendant 6 must be given a written copy of the conditions at the time sentence is 7 imposed which shall include the physical address of the probation office 8 where such defendant must report for probation and the telephone number 9 for such office. In any case where the defendant is given a written 10 copy of the conditions, a copy thereof must be filed with and become 11 part of the record of the case, and it is not necessary to specify the 12 conditions orally. The defendant shall also be provided with a written 13 copy of such conditions in the language of the defendant's choice. 14 § 2. Subdivision 5 of section 353.2 of the family court act, as added 15 by chapter 920 of the laws of 1982, is amended to read as follows: 16 5. The respondent must be given a written copy of the conditions at 17 the time probation supervision is ordered which shall include the phys- 18 ical address of the probation office where such respondent must report 19 for probation and the telephone number of such office. A copy of such 20 conditions must be filed with and become part of the record of the case. 21 The respondent shall also be provided with a written copy of such condi- 22 tions in the language of the respondent's choice. 23 § 3. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 24 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10583-03-5